Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3030.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.41, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Public safety officer. new text begin (a) new text end "Public safety officer" includes: (1) a peace officer defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c) or (d); (2) a correction officer employed at a correctional facility and charged with maintaining the safety, security, discipline, and custody of inmates at the facility; (3) a corrections staff person working in a public agency and supervising offenders in the community as defined in sections 243.05, subdivision 6; 244.19, subdivision 1; and 401.01, subdivision 2; (4) deleted text begin an individual employed on a full-time basis by the state or by a fire department of a governmental subdivision of the statedeleted text end new text begin a full-time firefighter or part-time firefighter working for the state or for a fire department of a governmental subdivision of the state or a volunteer firefighter or paid on-call firefighter working for a fire department of a governmental subdivision of the state or an independent nonprofit firefighting corporationnew text end , who is engaged in any of the following duties: (i) new text begin nonroutine stressful or strenuous physical new text end firefighting; new text begin (ii) training exercise that is nonroutine stressful or strenuous physical activity; new text end deleted text begin (ii)deleted text end new text begin (iii)new text end emergency motor vehicle operation; deleted text begin (iii)deleted text end new text begin (iv)new text end investigation into the cause and origin of fires; deleted text begin (iv)deleted text end new text begin (v)new text end the provision of emergency medical services; or deleted text begin (v)deleted text end new text begin (vi)new text end hazardous material responder; deleted text begin (5) a legally enrolled member of a volunteer fire department or member of an independent nonprofit firefighting corporation who is engaged in the hazards of firefighting; deleted text end deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end a good samaritan while complying with the request or direction of a public safety officer to assist the officer; deleted text begin (7)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end a reserve police officer or a reserve deputy sheriff while acting under the supervision and authority of a political subdivision; deleted text begin (8)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end a driver or attendant with a licensed basic or advanced life-support transportation service who is engaged in providing emergency care; deleted text begin (9)deleted text end new text begin (8)new text end a first responder who is certified by the director of the Office of Emergency Medical Services to perform basic emergency skills before the arrival of a licensed ambulance service and who is a member of an organized service recognized by a local political subdivision to respond to medical emergencies to provide initial medical care before the arrival of an ambulance; and deleted text begin (10)deleted text end new text begin (9)new text end a person, other than a state trooper, employed by the commissioner of public safety and assigned to the State Patrol, whose primary employment duty is either Capitol security or the enforcement of commercial motor vehicle laws and regulations. new text begin (b) For purposes of paragraph (a), clause (4), "volunteer firefighter," "paid on-call firefighter," "part-time firefighter," and "full-time firefighter" have the meanings given in section 424A.001, subdivisions 10 to 10c. For purposes of paragraph (a), clause (4), items (i) and (ii), "nonroutine stressful or strenuous physical" excludes actions of a clerical, administrative, or nonmanual nature. new text end